Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 4. Highways Equipment Working Capital Fund.

Sec. 44.68.210.
Fund established.

The highways equipment working capital fund is established as an intragovernmental service fund for the use of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1960; am § 13 ch 49 SLA 1963; am § 81 ch 138 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.74.010

. Renumbered in 1989.

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Funds, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 44.68.220.
Use of fund.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall use the highways equipment working capital fund for necessary expenses resulting from the centralization of equipment maintenance and for the operation of supply depots.
The annual estimated balance in the fund may be used by the legislature to make appropriations to the department to carry out the purposes of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1960; am § 82 ch 138 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.74.020. Renumbered in 1989.

Sec. 44.68.230.
Rental fees and charges.

Receipts from rental fees and surcharges to the various departments for equipment rental, repair, and supplies shall be deposited in the highways equipment working capital fund. The departments of the state government shall include in their annual budgets the rental fees, equipment repairs, and supplies.

Rental and surcharge rates charged by the department are subject to annual review and approval by the governor.

History.

(§§ 2, 3 ch 120 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (a) was formerly AS 44.74.030 and subsection (b) was formerly AS 44.74.060. Renumbered in 1989.

Sec. 44.68.240.
Records of fund.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall maintain cost accounting records showing the income and expenses of the highways equipment working capital fund.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1960; am § 14 ch 49 SLA 1963; am § 29 ch 126 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.74.040. Renumbered in 1989.

Sec. 44.68.250.
Additions and replacements to fund.

Additions to capital equipment, replacements of capital equipment, or improvements paid from the highways equipment working capital fund are subject to annual appropriation by the legislature and must be detailed in the executive budget.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.74.050. Renumbered in 1989.